California, session 20252026, AB2464.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25240 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25240. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, the commission, working with the Public Utilities Commission, shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a statewide assessment of all of the following:(1) The role and necessity of firm zero-carbon resources, as defined in Section 25305.5, in meeting the state’s clean energy and reliability objectives.(2) Potential technologies and strategies for integrating firm zero-carbon resources into the state’s energy mix.(3) Recommendations on procurement, policy, safety, and planning actions to deploy and support firm zero-carbon resources, if deemed necessary.(4) Current and projected renewable and firm zero-carbon generation capacity, reliability requirements under varying system conditions, and the cost and emission implications of firm zero-carbon resources.(b) (1) The assessment to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2032.SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)The demand for energy across the country is skyrocketing, driven by electrification, the increasing reliance on digital platforms and cloud computing, and economic development.(b)A substantial amount of new energy generation and transmission infrastructure is expected to be needed in the state to meet forecasted demand.(c)California has established ambitious clean energy goals and relies heavily on renewable resources, such as solar and wind, and energy storage.(d)To ensure grid reliability and meet clean energy targets, the state may require additional clean, firm resources that can provide dependable energy to better optimize integration of renewable resources and improve overall reliability.(e)The state’s energy market now includes dozens of load-serving entities, including electrical corporations, community choice aggregators, and direct access providers, with each of these entities responsible for meeting resource adequacy requirements.(f)This responsibility creates competition for multiple entities chasing the same renewable and storage projects, resulting in higher procurement costs. In addition, fragmented procurement undermines economies of scale and complicates statewide reliability planning, potentially undermining the procurement of needed, but difficult to build, clean, firm resources.(g)A statewide fact-based assessment of the types of resources needed to meet the needs of the state’s future energy grid would facilitate important and informed dialogue among state and local policymakers, regulators, and other stakeholder groups while maintaining the state’s position as a clean energy leader and growing the state’s economy for everyone.SEC. 2.Section 913.7 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:913.7.Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before June 30, 2027, the commission, working with the Energy Commission, shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a statewide assessment of all of the following:(a)The role and necessity of clean, firm resources in meeting the state’s clean energy and reliability objectives.(b)Potential technologies and strategies for integrating clean, firm resources into the state’s energy mix.(c)Recommendations on procurement, policy, and planning actions to support clean, firm resources, if deemed necessary.(d)Consideration of current and projected renewable and clean, firm generation capacity, reliability requirements under varying system conditions, and the cost and emission implications of clean, firm resources.